California, session 20252026, AB2024.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5367 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5367. The department shall not deny or delay the acceptance, review, processing, or determination of a permit application for a new advertising display along a portion of a new alignment of an interstate or primary highway on the basis that the highway project has not been accepted by the department as complete if the section of highway is open to the use of the public for vehicular travel within 1,000 feet of the location specified in the permit application.SEC. 2. Section 5441 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5441. An advertising display that is in violation of Section 5440 shall be subject to relocation or removal, removal with payment of compensation as described in Sections 5412 and 5443, 5443 or relocation three years from the date the freeway has been declared a landscaped freeway by the director or the director’s designee and the character of the freeway has been changed from a freeway to a landscaped freeway.SEC. 3. Section 5443 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5443. Nothing in this article prohibits any of the following:(a) A city, county, or city and county from designating the districts or zones in which advertising displays may be placed or prohibited as part of a city, county, or city and county land use or zoning ordinance.(b) (1)  A governmental entity from entering into a relocation agreement for any purpose, including, but not limited to, those purposes provided in Section 5412, or the department from allowing a lawfully erected display to be increased in height at its permitted location or to be relocated provided the height increase or relocation would not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code or an increase in the number of displays within the state that does not conform to this article. An increase in height permitted under this subdivision shall not be more than that necessary to restore the visibility of the display to the main-traveled way. Relocated displays may be placed in the same or a different city, county, or city and county, and relocation agreements shall be entered into between the sign and permit owner and the local governmental entity. An advertising display relocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed a placement requiring a new permit and shall comply with all of the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 5350) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 5400). A relocated display shall not result in a net increase of the number of displays adjacent to landscaped freeway segments statewide.(2) A relocated advertising display may be converted to or replaced with a message center pursuant to a relocation agreement for any purpose, including, but not limited to, the purposes provided pursuant to Section 5412. The department shall issue a permit, without any additional consideration and without requiring a local entity or state agency to pay compensation pursuant to Section 5412 or 5441, for a display that is being placed pursuant to a relocation agreement with another governmental entity if the relocated display conforms with this section. An advertising display converted or replaced with a message center pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed a placement requiring a new permit and shall comply with all the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 5350) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 5400).